Vermont, session 2025-2026, H420.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. chapter 53, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Project-Based Tax Increment Financing
§ 1906. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 2 of 18
(1) “Affordable housing” has the same meaning as in section 4303 of
this title.
(2) “Brownfield” has the same meaning as in 32 V.S.A.
§ 5404a(h)(4)(C).
(3) “Committed” means pledged and appropriated for the purpose of the
current and future payment of financing and related costs.
(4) “Coordinating agency” means a nonmunicipal entity that a
municipality designates to administer and coordinate a project.
(5) “Financing” means debt authorized by a municipality pursuant to
section 1909 of this subchapter, including principal, interest, and any fees or
charges directly related to that debt, to pay for a project.
(6) “Improvements” means:
(A) the installation or construction of infrastructure, including
utilities, transportation, public facilities and amenities, land and property
acquisition and demolition, brownfield remediation, site preparation, and flood
remediation and mitigation; and
(B) the funding of debt service interest payments for a period of up to
two years, beginning on the date on which the first debt is incurred.
(7) “Legislative body” means the mayor and alderboard, the city
council, the selectboard, and the president and trustees of an incorporated
village, as appropriate.
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 3 of 18
(8) “Municipality” means a city, town, or incorporated village.
(9) “Original taxable value” means the total valuation as determined in
accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 129 of all taxable real property located
within a project zone as of its creation date, as adjusted pursuant to section
1910 of this subchapter.
(10) “Project” means an improvement or improvements authorized by a
municipality pursuant to section 1907 of this subchapter.
(11) “Related costs” means expenses incurred and paid by a
municipality, exclusive of the actual cost of constructing and financing a
project, that are directly related to the creation and implementation of the
municipality’s project, including reimbursement of sums previously advanced
by the municipality for those purposes and any costs of a coordinating agency.
Related costs may not include direct municipal expenses such as departmental
or personnel costs.
(12) “Project zone” means an area encompassing a project authorized by
a municipality pursuant to section 1907 of this subchapter, provided that no
parcel within the project zone shall be divided or bisected by the project zone
boundary.
§ 1907. CREATION OF PROJECT AND PROJECT ZONE
(a) The legislative body of a municipality may create within its jurisdiction
a project, which shall consist of improvements that serve a public purpose, and
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 4 of 18
a project zone, which shall consist of the parcel on which a project is installed
or constructed and any immediately adjoining parcels.
(b) To create a project and project zone, a municipality shall:
(1) develop a project plan, including:
(A) a description of the proposed project and the proposed project
zone;
(B) a development financing plan;
(C) a pro forma projection of expected costs;
(D) a projection of revenues;
(E) a demonstration that the proposed project would not proceed
without the allocation of incremental tax revenues;
(F) evidence that the municipality is actively seeking or has obtained
other sources of funding and investment; and
(G) a development schedule that includes a list, a cost estimate, and a
schedule for the proposed project and projected private development to occur
as a result of the proposed project;
(2) develop a plan describing the project zone by its boundaries and the
properties therein, entitled “Proposed Project Zone (municipal name),
Vermont”;
(3) hold one or more public hearings, after public notice, on the
proposed project, including the plan developed pursuant to subdivision (2) of
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 5 of 18
this subsection; and
(4) adopt by act of the legislative body of the municipality the plan
developed under subdivision (2) of this subsection, which shall be recorded
with the municipal clerk and lister or assessor.
(c) The creation of a project zone shall occur at 12:01 a.m. on April 1 of the
calendar year the Vermont Economic Progress Council approves the use of tax
increment financing for the project pursuant to section 1908 of this subchapter.
§ 1908. PROJECT APPLICATION; VERMONT ECONOMIC PROGRESS
COUNCIL
(a) A municipality, upon approval of its legislative body, may apply to the
Vermont Economic Progress Council to use tax increment financing for a
project. The Vermont Economic Progress Council may approve only
applications meeting the standards of this section.
(b) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall review a municipality’s
project application to determine whether the municipality meets each of the
following criteria:
(1) the municipality is located in a county subject to a major disaster
declaration issued by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in 2023 or
2024;
(2) the municipality has created a project and project zone pursuant to
subsection 1907(b) of this subchapter; and
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 6 of 18
(3) the municipality has approved or pledged to use incremental
municipal tax revenues for the project in the proportion set in subsection
1910a(b) of this subchapter;
(c) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall review a municipality’s
project application to determine whether the project plan meets any of the
following criteria:
(1) the projected private development includes new or rehabilitated
affordable housing;
(2) the project or projected private development will stimulate the
remediation and redevelopment of a brownfield;
(3) the projected private development includes at least one entirely new
business or business operation or expansion of an existing business within the
project zone, and the business will provide new, quality, full-time jobs that
meet or exceed the prevailing wage for the region as reported by the
Department of Labor;
(4) the project or projected private development will enhance
transportation by creating improved traffic patterns and flow or creating or
improving public transportation systems; or
(5) the project substantially improves flood resiliency or remediates
flood damage.
(d) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall review a municipality’s
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 7 of 18
project application to determine whether the municipality has demonstrated
each of the following:
(1) the project and projected development are compatible with
confirmed municipal and regional development plans;
(2) the project has clear local and regional significance for employment,
housing, brownfield remediation, transportation improvements, or flood
remediation and mitigation;
(3) the municipality is leveraging sources of revenue from local, State,
or federal programs and requires additional funding to undertake the project;
and
(4) the municipality possesses the requisite experience to manage the
project, which the municipality may demonstrate through use of a coordinating
agency; and
(5) the municipality has developed a plan for fiscal viability.
(e) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall review a municipality’s
project application to determine that the project and any proposed development
in the project zone would not have occurred as proposed in the application, or
would have occurred in a significantly different and less desirable manner than
as proposed in the application, but for the proposed utilization of incremental
tax revenues, considering:
(1) the amount of additional time needed to complete the project and
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 8 of 18
any projected private development within the project zone and the amount of
additional cost that might be incurred if the project were to proceed without
education property tax increment financing;
(2) how the proposed project or projected private development
components and size, including, if applicable, the number of units of
affordable housing, would differ without education property tax increment
financing; and
(3)(A) the amount of additional revenue expected to be generated as a
result of the project;
(B) the percentage of that revenue that shall be paid to the Education
Fund;
(C) the percentage that shall be paid to the municipality; and
(D) the percentage of that revenue paid to the municipality that shall
be used to pay financing incurred to pay for the project.
(f) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall review a municipality’s
project application to determine that there is a nexus between the project and
the expected development and outcomes in the project zone.
(g) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall approve a
municipality’s tax increment financing plan prior to prior to a public vote to
pledge the credit of the municipality under section 1909 of this subchapter.
The tax increment financing plan shall include all information related to the
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 9 of 18
proposed financing necessary for approval by the Council and to ensure its
viability and consistency with the project plan developed pursuant to
subdivision 1907(b)(1) of this subchapter.
§ 1909. INDEBTEDNESS
(a) A municipality approved under section 1908 of this subchapter may
incur indebtedness against revenues of the project zone at any time during a
period of up to five years following the creation of the project zone. If no debt
is incurred during this five-year period, the project zone shall terminate.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of any municipal charter, each instance
of borrowing to finance or otherwise pay for a project shall occur only after the
legal voters of the municipality, by a majority vote of all voters present and
voting on the question at a special or annual municipal meeting duly warned
for the purpose, authorize the legislative body to pledge the credit of the
municipality, borrow, or otherwise secure the debt for the specific purposes so
warned.
(c) Any indebtedness incurred under this section may be retired over any
period authorized by the legislative body of the municipality.
(d) The project zone shall continue until the date and hour the indebtedness
is retired or, if no debt is incurred, five years following the creation of the
project zone.
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 10 of 18
(e) A municipal legislative body shall provide information to the public
prior to the public vote required under subsection (b) of this section. This
information shall include the amount and types of debt and related costs to be
incurred, including principal, interest, and fees; terms of the debt; the project to
be financed; the expected development to occur because of the project; and
notice to the voters that if the tax increment received by the municipality from
any property tax source is insufficient to pay the principal and interest on the
debt in any year, the municipality shall remain liable for the full payment of
the principal and interest for the term of the indebtedness. If interfund loans
within the municipality are used, the information must also include
documentation of the terms and conditions of the loan. If interfund loans
within the municipality are used as the method of financing, no interest shall
be charged.
§ 1910. ORIGINAL TAXABLE VALUE; TAX INCREMENT
(a) As of the date the project zone is created, the lister or assessor for the
municipality shall certify the original taxable value and shall certify to the
legislative body in each year thereafter during the life of the project zone the
amount by which the total valuation as determined in accordance with 32
V.S.A. chapter 129 of all taxable real property located within the project zone
has increased or decreased relative to the original taxable value.
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 11 of 18
(b) The original taxable value shall be increased each year by the lesser of
three percent and the property tax growth rate in the municipality.
(c) Throughout the life of the project zone, the lister or assessor shall
include not more than the original taxable value of the real property in the
assessed valuation upon which the treasurer computes the rates of all taxes
levied by the municipality and every other taxing district in which the project
zone is situated, but the treasurer shall extend all rates so determined against
the entire assessed valuation of real property for that year.
(d) Throughout the life of the project zone, a municipality shall remit not
less than the aggregate tax due on the original taxable value to the Education
Fund.
(e) Throughout the life of the project zone, the municipality shall hold
apart, rather than remit to the taxing districts, that proportion of all taxes paid
that year on the real property within the project zone that the excess valuation
bears to the total assessed valuation. The amount held apart each year is the
“tax increment” for that year. The tax increment shall only be used for
financing and related costs.
(f) Not more than the percentages established pursuant to section 1910a of
this subchapter of the municipal and State education tax increments received
with respect to the project zone and committed for the payment for financing
for improvements and related costs shall be segregated by the municipality in a
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 12 of 18
special project account and in its official books and records until all capital
indebtedness of the project has been fully paid. The final payment shall be
reported to the treasurer, who shall thereafter include the entire assessed
valuation of the project in the assessed valuations upon which the municipal
and other tax rates are computed and extended, and thereafter no taxes from
the project zone shall be deposited in the special project account.
(g) Notwithstanding any charter provision or other provision, all property
taxes assessed within a project zone shall be subject to the provisions of this
section. Special assessments levied under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A or 87 or
under a municipal charter shall not be considered property taxes for the
purpose of this section if the proceeds are used exclusively for operating
expenses related to properties within the project zone and not for
improvements within the project zone.
§ 1910a. USE OF TAX INCREMENT; RETENTION PERIOD
(a) Education property tax increment. For only debt incurred within the
period permitted under subsection 1909(a) of this subchapter and related costs,
up to 70 percent of the education property tax increment may be retained for
the period determined by the Vermont Economic Progress Council pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section, beginning the first year in which debt is incurred
for the project. Upon incurring the first debt, a municipality shall notify the
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 13 of 18
Department of Taxes and the Vermont Economic Progress Council of the
beginning of the retention period of the education tax increment.
(b) Municipal property tax increment. For only debt incurred within the
period permitted under subsection 1909(a) of this subchapter and related costs,
not less than 85 percent of the municipal property tax increment may be
retained, beginning the first year in which debt is incurred for the project.
(c) Retention period. The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall
determine the shortest retention period for a project consistent with the project
plan. In no case shall a retention period exceed 20 years.
(d) Excess tax increment.
(1) Of the municipal and education property tax increments received in
any tax year that exceed the amounts committed for the payment of the
financing and related costs for a project, equal portions of each increment may
be retained for the following purposes:
(A) to prepay principal and interest on the financing;
(B) to place in a special project account required pursuant to
subsection 1910(d) of this subchapter and use for future financing payments; or
(C) to use for defeasance of the financing.
(2) Any remaining portion of the excess education property tax
increment shall be distributed to the Education Fund. Any remaining portion
of the excess municipal property tax increment shall be distributed to the city,
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 14 of 18
town, or village budget in the proportion that each budget bears to the
combined total of the budgets unless otherwise negotiated by the city, town, or
village.
§ 1910b. INFORMATION REPORTING
(a) A municipality with an active project shall:
(1) develop a system, segregated for the project, to identify, collect, and
maintain all data and information necessary to fulfill the reporting
requirements of this section, including performance measures;
(2) provide timely notification to the Department of Taxes and the
Vermont Economic Progress Council of any project debt, public vote, or vote
by the municipal legislative body immediately following the debt incurrence or
public vote on a form prescribed by the Council, including copies of public
notices, agendas, minutes, vote tally, and a copy of the information provided to
the public pursuant to subsection 1909(e) of this subchapter; and
(3) annually on or before October 15, submit on a form prescribed by
the Vermont Economic Progress Council an annual report to the Council and
the Department of Taxes, including the information required by subdivision (2)
of this subsection if not previously submitted, the information required for
annual audit under section 1910c of this subchapter, and any information
required by the Council or the Department of Taxes for the report required
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 15 of 18
(b) Annually on or before January 1, the Vermont Economic Progress
Council and the Department of Taxes shall submit a report to the Senate
Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs and on
Finance and the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development
and on Ways and Means on projects approved pursuant to this subchapter,
including for each:
(1) the date of approval;
(2) a description of the project;
(3) the original taxable value of the project zone;
(4) the scope and value of projected and actual improvements and
developments in the project zone;
(5) projected and actual incremental revenue amounts;
(6) the allocation of incremental revenue;
(7) projected and actual financing;
(8) performance measures developed by the Vermont Economic
Progress Council; and
(9) the amount of infrastructure work performed by Vermont firms.
§ 1910c. AUDITING
Annually on or before April 1 until the year following the end of the period
for retention of education property tax increment, a municipality with a project
approved under this subchapter shall ensure that the project is subject to the
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 16 of 18
annual audit prescribed in 24 V.S.A. § 1681 or 1690 and submit a copy to the
Vermont Economic Progress Council. If a project is subject only to the audit
under 24 V.S.A. § 1681, the Council shall ensure a process is in place to
subject the project to an independent audit. Procedures for the audit must
include verification of the original taxable value and annual and total
municipal and education property tax increments generated, expenditures for
financing and related costs, and current balance.
§ 1910d. GUIDANCE
(a) The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development, after
reasonable notice to a municipality and an opportunity for a hearing, may issue
decisions to a municipality on questions and inquiries concerning the
administration of projects, statutes, rules, noncompliance with this subchapter,
and any instances of noncompliance identified in audit reports conducted
pursuant to section 1910c of this subchapter.
(b) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall prepare
recommendations for the Secretary of Commerce and Community
Development prior to any decision issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section. The Council may prepare recommendations in consultation with the
Commissioner of Taxes, the Attorney General, and the State Treasurer. In
preparing recommendations, the Council shall provide a municipality with a
reasonable opportunity to submit written information in support of its position.
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 17 of 18
(c) The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development shall review
the recommendations of the Council and issue a final written decision on each
matter within 60 days following receipt of the recommendations. The
Secretary may permit an appeal to be taken by any party to a Superior Court
for determination of questions of law in the same manner as the Supreme Court
may by rule provide for appeals before final judgment from a Superior Court
before issuing a final decision.
(d) The Vermont Economic Progress Council may adopt policies that are
consistent with the 2015 TIF Rule, as modified by subsequent rulemaking, to
implement this subchapter.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 3325 is amended to read:
§ 3325. VERMONT ECONOMIC PROGRESS COUNCIL
(a) Creation. The Vermont Economic Progress Council is created to
exercise the authority and perform the duties assigned to it, including its
authority and duties relating to:
(1) the Vermont Employment Growth Incentive Program pursuant to
subchapter 2 of this chapter; and
(2) tax increment financing districts pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 53,
subchapter 5 and section 5404a of this title; and
(3) project-based tax increment financing pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter
53, subchapter 7.
VT LEG #379806 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.420
2025 Page 18 of 18
* * *
(g) Decisions not subject to review. A decision of the Council to approve
or deny an application under subchapter 2 of this chapter, or; to approve or
deny a tax increment financing district pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 53,
subchapter 5 and section 5404a of this title,; or to approve or deny a project
pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 53, subchapter 7 is an administrative decision
that is not subject to the contested case hearing requirements under 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 and is not subject to judicial review.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379806 v.4